Massachusetts, session 194th, S2162.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the 
following new chapter:  
PURPOSE:  
The COVID-19 Pandemic, which began in the year 2020, and may well continue deep 
into future years, and possibly further, has already taken a toll that is massive, tragic, and 
devastating to the lives of tens of thousands, of Massachusetts residents; disrupted, and damaged 
the lives of the people of Massachusetts, their families, schools and other educational 
institutions, workplaces, friends; businesses, the economy, other institutions of society, and 
more. These losses, as they mount, are also accompanied by the damage to the health, perhaps 

of 3 10 for life, of many thousands of other individuals. The losses, as of the original writing of these 
words, are already at the level previously encountered, only in previous military conflicts; and 
these losses are likely to continue to mount, far beyond those levels.  
Public Monuments, serve many purposes, including to honor significant persons, and to 
remember important losses; thereby providing specific respect, and some important roles in 
public education.  
Therefore, this legislation, establishes a Purpose for developing a Massachusetts COVID-
19 Memorial. 
SECTION 2. To establish this Memorial, this enabling legislation, authorizes the creation 
of a Massachusetts COVID-19 Memorial Commission, to honor those who have died from the 
virus, been injured, and/or harmed by it, and to encourage thoughtful reflection on the 
circumstances of the Pandemic, in Massachusetts. 
This Commission, shall have nineteen (19) members, appointed by the Governor of 
Massachusetts, and other specified officials: One (1) designee of the Governor; One (1) designee 
of the President of the Senate; One (1) designee of the Speaker of the House; Five (5) Chief 
Executive Officers, or their designees, from accredited hospitals, whose primary offices, are in 
the Commonwealth; One (1) representative of Massachusetts Nurses; One (1) representative of 
Massachusetts Doctors; One (1) representative of Massachusetts Educators; One (1) 
representative of EMTs; One (1) representative of Firefighters; One (1) representative of Police 
Officers; One (1) representative of Homemakers; One (1) representative of Food Service 
Workers; Three (3) Citizens At Large 

of 3 31  SECTION 3. The life of this Commission, shall be up to three (3) years, from its 
appointment; and it shall select a Chairperson, from among its membership. 
This Commission, shall publicize its Mission of Memorial, and welcome any, and all, 
appropriate ideas for a fixed Memorial, a location for such Memorial, in a statue type display, 
and possibly including a public health educational outreach program, on viruses, vaccines, and 
other similar effective disease controlling, and defeating; scientific, and public engaging 
activities. 
A Report shall be produced, with analysis, recommendations, and suggestions for such a 
Memorial.